Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Immunization in Long-Term Care Facilities

209.550.
Definitions for KRS 209.550 to 209.554.

As used in KRS 209.550 to 209.554, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the department;

“Department” means the Department for Public Health;

“Documentation” means written evidence from an individual’s health care provider that indicates the date and place the individual received the influenza vaccine or the pneumococcal vaccine;

“Employee” means an individual who is employed, directly or by contract, with another entity, on a part-time or full-time basis;

“Medically contraindicated” describes a situation in which the influenza or pneumococcal vaccine should not be administered to an individual because of a condition that the individual has that will be detrimental to the individual’s health if the individual receives the vaccine; and

“Long-term care facility” has the same meaning as in KRS 216.510, except that for purposes of KRS 209.550 to 209.554, “long-term care facility” does not include family-care homes or personal-care homes.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 151, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

209.552.
Immunization against pneumococcal disease and influenza — Documentation — Immunization of employees.

Every long-term care facility shall require residents to be immunized against pneumococcal disease and influenza. Upon admission, the long-term care facility shall:

Notify the resident of the requirements of this section and request that the resident agree to be immunized against pneumococcal disease and influenza virus;

Assess the resident’s immunization status for influenza virus and pneumococcal disease;

Counsel each resident on the risks of influenza and pneumococcal disease; the efficacy, side effects, and contraindications of these immunizations; and the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control prior to administration of the vaccines; and

Provide or arrange for immunizations against pneumococcal and influenza in accordance with the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control, unless medically contraindicated, if the resident or long-term care facility does not have documentation of the immunization.

Every long-term care facility shall document immunization against influenza virus every influenza season, by October 15 or upon admission, whichever comes later, and pneumococcal immunization for each resident. Upon finding that a resident lacks either of these immunizations, the facility shall provide or arrange for the immunization in accordance with the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control, unless medically contraindicated.

Every long-term care facility shall require each employee, regardless of employment status, to be immunized against pneumococcal and influenza virus. Upon employment, the long-term care facility shall:

Notify the employee of the requirements of this section and request that the employee agree to be immunized against pneumococcal disease and influenza virus;

Assess the employee’s immunization status for influenza virus and pneumococcal disease;

Counsel each employee on the risks of influenza and pneumococcal disease; the efficacy, side effects, and contraindications of these immunizations; and the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control prior to administration of the vaccines; and

Provide or arrange for immunizations against pneumococcal and influenza in accordance with the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control, unless medically contraindicated, if the employee or the long-term care facility does not have documentation of the appropriate immunizations.

Every long-term care facility shall document immunization against influenza virus every influenza season, by October 15 or upon employment, whichever comes later, and pneumococcal immunization for each employee. Upon finding that an employee lacks either of these immunizations, the facility shall provide or arrange for immunization in accordance with the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control, unless medically contraindicated.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if:

The vaccine is medically contraindicated;

The employee, resident, or resident’s legal guardian objects to the immunizations due to religious beliefs; or

The employee or resident refuses the vaccine after being fully informed of the health risks.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 151, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2020 ch. 36, § 15, effective July 15, 2020.

209.554.
Administrative regulations — Educational literature — Information available on request.

The commissioner of the department shall implement the provisions of KRS 209.550 to 209.554 through the promulgation of administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A.

The department shall make educational literature that describes the risks of influenza and pneumococcal disease; the efficacy, side effects, and contraindications of these immunizations; and the recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control available to every long-term care facility.

The commissioner of the department shall make available upon request the number of outbreaks in long-term care facilities for each year due to influenza virus and pneumococcal disease and the number of hospitalizations of long-term care facility residents due to influenza virus, pneumococcal disease, and associated complications.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 151, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2017 ch. 80, § 38, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 36, § 16, effective July 15, 2020.